Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1506
Agreement; revocation.

An agreement shall be subject to revocation by any party to the agreement upon six months' notice to the other unless a different period of time is provided for the agreement. No agreement may provide for a notice period for revocation in excess of five years.

Laws 1989, LB 508, § 6.